Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.386

Voting rights—Methods—Proxy—Under eighteen years of age.

(1) No member may have more than one vote. A natural person may not hold more than one membership in a credit union on behalf of himself or herself. An organization having membership in a credit union may cast one vote through a natural person agent duly authorized in writing.

(2) Members may vote, as prescribed in the credit union's bylaws, by mail ballot, absentee ballot, or other method. However, no member may vote by proxy.

(3) A member who is not at least eighteen years of age is not eligible to vote as a member unless otherwise provided in the credit union's bylaws.

[ 2017 c 61 s 9; 1997 c 397 s 28; 1994 c 256 s 76; 1984 c 31 s 17. Formerly RCW 31.12.155.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.